Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 19 Language Interpreters — Use of Language Interpreters in Legal Proceedings

8-19-1.
Legislative declaration — Intent.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Rhode Island to guarantee the rights of persons who, because of a non-English speaking background, are unable to readily understand or communicate in the English language, and who consequently need the assistance of an interpreter to be fully protected in legal proceedings in matters before the Rhode Island unified state court system. Court interpretation requires not only a full command of two (2) languages, but also a knowledge of courtroom procedure, legal vocabulary, the overall court and legal systems, and an understanding that the role of an interpreter consists not of abridging or editorializing, but of exactly interpreting every word that is spoken without emendation or amendment.

It is the intent of the legislature, by the enactment of this chapter, to provide interpreters to limited-English-proficient persons in proceedings before the state courts in Rhode Island and to establish a procedure for the certification and appointment of interpreters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 15; P.L. 2014, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 88, § 1.

8-19-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

A “limited-English-proficient person” means any person whose primary language is not English and who does not have the ability to adequately understand or communicate effectively in English.

A “qualified interpreter” is a person who is able to interpret simultaneously and consecutively and sight translate from English into a foreign language and from said language into English but who is not certified pursuant to this chapter.

A “certified interpreter” is one who is able to interpret simultaneously and consecutively and sight translate from English to the language of the person needing an interpreter, and from said language to English, and who has been certified pursuant to the provision of §

8-19-5

.

“Legal proceedings” means any proceeding in the Rhode Island state court system.

“Appointing authority” means the judicial officer presiding at a legal proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 88, § 1.

8-19-3.
Appointment of certified or qualified interpreters.

When a limited-English-proficient person is a party, or the parent or legal guardian of a party, to a legal proceeding, or an alleged victim in a criminal proceeding, the appointing authority shall appoint a certified interpreter to assist such person during the legal proceeding. The state court administrator’s office shall maintain a list of Rhode Island certified and qualified interpreters from which the appointing authority shall make its appointments.

The appointing authority may appoint a qualified interpreter in place of a certified interpreter when:

A good-faith effort has been made to locate and obtain the services of a certified interpreter and one is not available; and

The appointing authority makes a finding that the proposed qualified interpreter appears to have adequate language skills; knowledge of interpreting techniques; familiarity with interpreting in a court or hearing; and that he/she has read, understands, and will abide by an established code of ethics for language interpreters pursuant to this chapter; and

The proceeding is one of a preliminary nature and of a short duration. Proceedings of a preliminary nature may include but not be limited to:

Arraignments;

Costs, restitution, and/or fine reviews;

Probation reviews;

Preliminary hearings on pretrial motions; and

Appearances before the court on bench warrants or arrest warrants.

If any relationship between the interpreter and any of the parties, attorneys, witnesses, victims, or any other persons involved in the proceeding exists, the nature of that relationship shall be disclosed to the appointing authority on the record and the appointing authority may in its discretion excuse the interpreter from said proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 15; P.L. 2014, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 88, § 1.

8-19-4.
Compensation of interpreters.

Interpreters appointed pursuant to this chapter shall be paid by the state in accordance with a fee schedule that shall be established by the supreme court. The state court administrator is hereby empowered to establish policies and procedures governing the appointment, service, and payment of interpreters appointed under this chapter and is further empowered to enter into service contracts with certified and qualified interpreters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 88, § 1.

8-19-5.
Certification of interpreters — Establishment and procedure.

The administrative office of state courts, with the approval of the supreme court, shall promulgate standards, criteria, and testing methods for the certification of foreign language interpreters under this chapter. The regulations promulgated shall address but not be limited to:

Developing testing procedures for proficiency in the foreign language for which the interpreter is seeking certification;

Developing testing procedures for proficiency in the English language;

Developing testing procedures for knowledge of legal proceedings and legal terminologies;

Developing standards for the approval of courses and/or curricula at colleges and universities and other institutes of higher learning that wish to offer courses in foreign language interpreting;

Establishing minimum competency requirements for state certification as a foreign language interpreter;

Establishing re-certification procedures and continuing educational requirements for certified and qualified interpreters;

Establishing procedures for the termination, cancellation, or suspension of certificates issued to foreign language interpreters under this chapter;

Establishing a code of ethics for foreign language interpreters;

Establishing procedures for the recognition of foreign language interpreters who have been certified in other states or by the federal court;

Establishing a procedure for the compilation and maintenance of statistics on the frequency and use of foreign language interpreters appointed under this chapter and the need for foreign language interpreters in other languages; and

Establishing a procedure for the creation of a list of the names and contact information of all certified interpreters and qualified interpreters and making said list available to all courts covered by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 79, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 88, § 1.

8-19-6.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 340, § 1.

8-19-7.
Confidential communications.

No interpreter/transliterator appointed pursuant to this chapter to interpret or translate for limited-English-proficient persons in proceedings before the state courts in Rhode Island shall be called upon to testify concerning any statement(s) made to them in connection with the interpreter’s or transliterator’s interpretation or transliteration without the consent of the person making the statement or unless compelled by court order.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 164, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 270, § 1.